Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4981.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 16281. (1) If there is a compelling need for records or information to determine whether child abuse or child neglect has occurred or to take action to protect a child where there may be a substantial risk of harm, a family independence agency department of health and human services caseworker or administrator directly involved in the child abuse or child neglect investigation shall notify a licensee or registrant that a child abuse or child neglect investigation has been initiated regarding a child who has received services from the licensee or registrant and shall request in writing the child's medical records and information that are pertinent to that investigation. Upon On the receipt of this notification and request, the licensee or registrant shall review all of the child's medical records and information in the licensee's or registrant's possession to determine if there are medical records or information that is pertinent to that investigation. Within 14 days after receipt of a request made under this subsection, the licensee or registrant shall release those pertinent medical records and information to the department of health and human services caseworker or administrator directly involved in the child abuse or child neglect investigation. (2) The following privileges do not apply to medical records or information released or made available under subsection (1): (a) The physician-patient privilege created in section 2157 of the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.2157. (b) The dentist-patient privilege created in section 16648. (c) The licensed professional counselor-client and limited licensed professional counselor-client privilege created in section 18117. (d) The psychologist-patient privilege created in section 18237. (e) Any other health professional-patient privilege created or recognized by law. (3) To the extent not protected by the immunity conferred by 1964 PA 170, MCL 691.1401 to 691.1415, 691.1419, an individual who in good faith provides access to medical records or information under this section is immune from civil or administrative liability arising from that conduct, unless the conduct was gross negligence or willful and wanton misconduct. (4) This section does not apply to a report, record, datum, or information whose confidentiality and disclosure are governed by section 5131. (5) A duty under this act relating to child abuse and child neglect does not alter a duty imposed under another statute, including the child protection law, 1975 PA 238, MCL 722.621 to 722.638, regarding the reporting or investigation of child abuse or child neglect. Sec. 16905. (1) This part does not apply to an individual engaged in the practice of social work as defined in part 185, in the course of employment with a governmental agency or a reputable social service agency regularly providing social work services as an agency. (2) This part does not apply to an ordained cleric or other religious practitioner who is employed by or working under the authority of an organization exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code of 1986, 26 USC 501, if the advice or counsel given by the cleric or other religious practitioner is incidental to his or her the cleric's or other religious practitioner's duties as a cleric or other religious practitioner, and if the cleric or other religious practitioner does not hold himself or herself the cleric or other religious practitioner out to the public as a marriage and family therapist licensed under this article or use 1 or more of the titles listed in section 16903 and if no fee or donation is exacted for the service. (3) This part does not apply to a physician licensed under this article who has completed an accredited psychiatric residency program approved by the Michigan board of medicine or to a psychologist fully licensed under this article, if both of the following circumstances exist: (a) The individual is practicing his or her the individual's profession in a manner consistent with his or her the individual's education and training and is practicing in a manner consistent with the code of ethics of that profession. (b) The individual does not hold himself or herself the individual out to the public as a marriage and family therapist licensed under this article or use any of the titles listed in section 16903 for advertising purposes. However, this subdivision does not prohibit the individual from advertising under a telephone or other business directory listing that uses those titles if the individual discloses in the listing, in an unabbreviated fashion, the profession in which he or she the individual is licensed. (4) This part does not limit an individual in, or prevent an individual from, the practice of a statutorily regulated profession or occupation if services to families, couples, or subsystems of families are part of the services provided by that profession or occupation, and if the individual does not hold himself or herself the individual out to the public as a marriage and family therapist licensed under this article or use 1 or more of the titles listed in section 16903. As used in this subsection, "statutorily regulated profession or occupation" means an occupation or profession regulated by statute that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following: a physician, attorney, social worker, social service technician, fully licensed psychologist, limited licensed psychologist, temporary limited licensed psychologist, licensed professional counselor, limited licensed professional counselor, or school counselor. Sec. 18101. As used in this part: (a) "Clinical counseling principles, methods, or procedures" means 1 or more of the following: (i) Psychotherapy, the diagnosis and treatment planning for mental and emotional disorders, and evaluation. (ii) Selecting, administering, scoring, and interpreting assessments, tests, and appraisals that are designed to assess an individual's aptitudes, interests, attitudes, abilities, achievements, and personal characteristics in order to use appraisal and diagnostic results in helping processes. (iii) Psychoeducational consulting. As used in this subparagraph, "psychoeducational consulting" means assisting a consultee that is working with an individual, small group, or organization by identifying problems, strengths, and weaknesses and making recommendations for the implementation of preventative or remedial strategies. (iv) Counseling techniques. As used in this subparagraph: (A) "Counseling techniques" means the application of basic counseling and psychotherapy skills and theories in the counseling process for the purposes of establishing and maintaining the counseling relationship; diagnosing the problem; formulating a preventative, treatment, or rehabilitative plan; and facilitating appropriate interventions. (B) "Diagnosing the problem" means the identification of the problem through the application of recognized counseling techniques and psychotherapy skills and theories, including the use of the classifications and diagnoses in the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual for Mental Disorders, obtained through the successful completion of a qualified program. Diagnosing the problem does not include the identification of other medical or physical conditions. (v) Behavioral modification techniques. As used in this subparagraph, "behavioral modification techniques" means assisting clients in identifying maladaptive or harmful behaviors and replacing them with adaptive and helpful behaviors. (vi) Referral. As used in this subparagraph, "referral" includes determining the need for referral to 1 or more statutorily regulated mental health professionals whose expertise, skills, and competence are appropriate to the problems of the individual, informing the individual of the referral, and communicating as appropriate with the professional to whom the individual has been referred. (vii) Preventative techniques. As used in this subparagraph, "preventative techniques" means assisting a client in maintaining mental and emotional well-being and preventing emotional distress and mental illness. (viii) Establishing a counseling plan for the treatment of 1 or more of the following disorders of an individual, couple, group, or family: (A) An emotional disorder. (B) A mental disorder. (C) An addiction disorder. (D) A physical disorder that requires a counseling intervention. (ix) Promoting mental health wellness. As used in this subparagraph, "mental health wellness" means the achievement of social, career, and emotional development across an individual's life span. (x) Preventing and treating mental and emotional disorders. As used in this subparagraph, "preventing and treating mental and emotional disorders" includes the use of crisis intervention. (b) "Licensed professional counselor" means an individual who is licensed under this article to engage in the practice of counseling without supervision. (c) "Limited licensed professional counselor" or "limited licensed counselor" means an individual who has been granted a limited license under this article to engage in the practice of counseling under the supervision of a licensed professional counselor who meets the requirement of section 18106. (d) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (e), "practice of counseling" or "counseling" means the rendering to individuals, groups, families, organizations, or the general public in accordance with accepted and established ethics a service involving clinical counseling principles, methods, or procedures for the purpose of achieving social, personal, career, and emotional development and with the goal of promoting and enhancing healthy self-actualizing and satisfying lifestyles whether the services are rendered in an educational, business, health, private practice, or human services setting. (e) The practice of counseling does not include the practice of psychology except for those preventive techniques, counseling techniques, or behavior modification techniques for which the licensed professional counselor or limited licensed professional counselor has been specifically trained. The practice of counseling does not include the practice of medicine or osteopathic medicine and surgery, including, but not limited to, the differential diagnosis of medical conditions or disorders, prescribing drugs, or administering electroconvulsive therapy. A counselor shall not hold himself or herself oneself out as any of the following: (i) A psychologist as that term is defined in section 18201. (ii) A marriage and family therapist as that term is defined in section 16901. (iii) A licensed bachelor's social worker or a licensed master's social worker as those terms are defined in section 18501. (f) "Qualified program" means any of the following: (i) A program that is accredited by the Council for the Accreditation of Counseling and Related Educational Programs, includes coursework and training in the diagnosis and treatment of mental and emotional disorders, and is approved by the department in consultation with the board. (ii) A program that is not accredited by the Council for the Accreditation of Counseling and Related Educational Programs, includes coursework and training in the diagnosis and treatment of mental and emotional disorders and all other coursework requirements of the Council for the Accreditation of Counseling and Related Educational Programs, including practicum and internship requirements, and is approved by the department in consultation with the board. Sec. 18105. (1) A licensee shall not perform any acts, tasks, or functions within the practice of counseling unless he or she the licensee is trained to perform such acts, tasks, or functions. (2) Effective October 1, 1990, a person An individual shall not engage in the practice of counseling unless licensed or otherwise authorized under this article. (3) The following words, titles, or letters or a combination thereof, with or without qualifying words or phrases, are restricted in use only to those persons individuals authorized under this part to use the terms and in a way prescribed in this part: "licensed professional counselor", "licensed counselor", "professional counselor", and "l.p.c.", "limited licensed professional counselor", and "l.l.p.c.". Sec. 18106. A licensed professional counselor shall not supervise a limited licensed professional counselor without completing training in supervision as required by rules promulgated by the department in consultation with the board. Sec. 18111. (1) Subject to subsection (3), the department may grant a limited license to an individual who meets both of the following criteria: (a) Is not less than 18 years of age. (b) Has received, from an accredited college or university approved by the department, a master's or doctoral degree in counseling from a qualified program, or a degree determined by the department in consultation with the board to be substantially equivalent to a counseling degree from a qualified program. The department in consultation with the board shall promulgate rules to establish standards to approve qualified programs. (2) A limited license granted under this section must require that the individual confine his or her the individual's practice to a program of counseling experience under the supervision of a licensed professional counselor. (3) The department in consultation with the board shall promulgate rules under section 16145 as necessary or appropriate to supplement the requirements for licensure under this part as a limited licensed professional counselor, including adopting updated standards of the Council for the Accreditation of Counseling and Related Educational Programs or a successor organization. Sec. 18114. (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3), the department may grant relicensure as a licensed professional counselor or limited licensed professional counselor to an individual who is applying for relicensure less than 3 years after the expiration date of his or her the individual's license, if the individual submits to the department a completed application on a form provided by the department together with payment of the fees described in section 16201(3), and he or she the individual complies with both of the following: (a) Submits with his or her the individual's application a professional disclosure statement that meets the requirements of section 18113. (b) If the individual holds or has held a license as a licensed professional counselor or limited licensed professional counselor in another state, ensures that the licensing agency of each out-of-state license verifies all of the following on a form provided by the department: (i) That disciplinary proceedings are not pending against the individual at the time of his or her the individual's application for relicensure. (ii) That if sanctions have been imposed against the individual, the sanctions are not in force at the time of his or her the individual's application for relicensure. (2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3), the department may grant relicensure as a licensed professional counselor or limited licensed professional counselor to an individual who is applying for relicensure more than 3 years after the expiration date of his or her the individual's license, if the individual submits to the department a completed application on a form provided by the department together with payment of the fees described in section 16201(4) and a professional disclosure statement that meets the requirements of section 18113, and he or she the individual complies with 1 of the following: (a) Takes or retakes and passes 1 of the following: (i) The national counselor examination developed by the National Board for Certified Counselors. (ii) The certification examination given by the Commission on Rehabilitation Counselor Certification. (iii) An examination that the department determines is equivalent to an examination described in subparagraph (i) or (ii). (b) Demonstrates to the satisfaction of the department that he or she the individual meets the requirements for certification issued by the National Board for Certified Counselors, the Commission on Rehabilitation Counselor Certification, or an equivalent program as determined by the department. (3) The department may grant relicensure as a licensed professional counselor or limited licensed professional counselor to an individual who received a master's or doctoral degree in counseling or student personnel work before October 1, 1991, and completed 2 years of professional experience before October 1, 1993, if the individual submits to the department a completed application on a form provided by the department together with payment of the applicable fees described in section 16201(3) or (4) and he or she the individual complies with 1 of the following: (a) Submits with his or her the individual's application a professional disclosure statement that meets the requirements of section 18113. (b) If the individual holds or has held a license as a licensed professional counselor or limited licensed professional counselor in another state, ensures that the licensing agency of each out-of-state license verifies all of the following on a form provided by the department: (i) That disciplinary proceedings are not pending against the individual at the time of his or her the individual's application for relicensure. (ii) That if sanctions have been imposed against the individual, the sanctions are not in force at the time of his or her the individual's application for relicensure. Sec. 18117. For the purposes of this part, the confidential relations and communications between a licensed professional counselor or a limited licensed professional counselor and a client of the licensed professional counselor or a limited licensed professional counselor are privileged communications, and this part does not require a privileged communication to be disclosed, except as otherwise provided by law. Confidential information may be disclosed only upon consent of the client, pursuant to section 16222 if the licensee reasonably believes it is necessary to disclose the information to comply with section 16222, or under section 16281.